District of Columbia statutes.
31-1607

Contestability.

An insurer may contest the validity of a policy or contract for 3 years from the date of issuance, amendment, or renewal of the policy or contract, if the basis for contesting the validity is that the insured knowingly failed or refused to disclose to the insurer that he or she had AIDS at the time of issuance, amendment, or renewal of any policy issued under this chapter, and the insurance company was prohibited by law from conducting a test to determine the exposure of the insured to the AIDS virus on the date the insurer and insured entered into a contract.

Aug. 7, 1986, D.C. Law 6-132, § 8, 33 DCR 3615
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-208, § 2(f), 36 DCR 471
1981 Ed., § 35-227.